Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-628 Nonliability and limitation on
liability of secured party; liability of secondary obligor. (a) Unless a
secured party knows that a person is a debtor or obligor, knows the identity of
the person, and knows how to communicate with the person:

(1) The secured party is not liable to the person, or
to a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against
the person, for failure to comply with this article; and

(2) The secured party's failure to comply with this
article does not affect the liability of the person for a deficiency.

(b) A secured party is not liable because of
its status as secured party:

(1) To a person that is a debtor or obligor, unless
the secured party knows:

(A) That the person is a debtor or obligor;

(B) The identity of the person; and

(C) How to communicate with the person; or

(2) To a secured party or lienholder that has filed a
financing statement against a person, unless the secured party knows:

(A) That the person is a debtor; and

(B) The identity of the person.

(c) A secured party is not liable to any
person, and a person's liability for a deficiency is not affected, because of
any act or omission arising out of the secured party's reasonable belief that a
transaction is not a consumer-goods transaction or a consumer transaction or
that goods are not consumer goods, if the secured party's belief is based on
its reasonable reliance on:

(1) A debtor's representation concerning the purpose
for which collateral was to be used, acquired, or held; or

(2) An obligor's representation concerning the
purpose for which a secured obligation was incurred.

(d) A secured party is not liable to any
person under section 490:9-625(c)(2) for its failure to comply with section
490:9-616.

(e) A secured party is not liable under
section 490:9-625(c)(2) more than once with respect to any one secured
obligation. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next